New York, session 2025-2026, A5133.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 7-104 of the election law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 15-a to read as follows: 3 15-a. (a) When a question or proposal is included on the ballot, there 4 shall be the following with the description of the question or proposal 5 for each type of vote which can be chosen: 6 "A (type of vote) vote shall have the effect of (the positive or nega- 7 tive effects of the type of vote winning such question or proposal)." 8 (b) The language required by this subdivision shall be written by the 9 secretary of state and approved by the attorney general. Such language 10 shall be posted on the secretary of state's website after being approved 11 by the attorney general and before the date on which the official 12 ballots are sent to be printed. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 14 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08776-01-5